Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Chapter 19. Separate Road Districts
§ 65-19-81.
Public highways extending into municipalities.

Where any public highway being constructed, improved, or maintained by any separate road district shall run or extend into or through any incorporated municipality within the said district, such highway may be constructed, improved, and maintained the same within as without the corporate limits of said municipality. With the consent of and in conjunction with the road commissioners, the said municipality may, out of its own funds, add such street crossings or make improvements, such as grading, culverts, graveling, paving, or other improvements, as it may desire; the mayor and board of aldermen shall, by an order spread upon their minutes, consent for the work to be done by the commissioners. This section shall not be construed as any limitation upon those sections of this title in reference to state highways.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7179; 1930, § 6458; 1942, § 8409; Laws, 1914, ch. 255.

§ 65-19-83.
Benefit district roads.

Whenever the owners of not less than one-half of the land bordering on or adjacent to any section of road established shall petition for a survey and estimate of the cost of building the road in a substantial and permanent manner of stone, gravel, chert, slag, brick, a combination of such material, or of any material equally durable and economical, the board may cause a survey and estimate to be made by a licensed civil engineer. Whenever thereafter the petitioners shall present to the board a map or description of the land which in their opinion would be directly benefited by the construction of such road, together with the written requests of the owners of not less than three-fifths of such land asking that all lands so benefited be assessed in proportion to the benefit conferred to pay one-third of the cost of construction, the board may levy and collect a special tax on such lands sufficient to pay one third of the cost thereof. Such lands shall be known as the benefit district of such section of road.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 365; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3738; 1930, § 6459; 1942, § 8410; Laws, 1902, ch. 145.

§ 65-19-85.
Assessment of benefit district lands.

The board, in assessing the benefits derived by any land in such district, shall consider only its proximity to the road and its market terminus. No benefit assessment shall be made on any lands when the distance between it and the nearest point on the road is greater than three tenths of the distance from such point on the road to the market terminus of the road, and no benefit assessment shall be made on any land more than three and one-half miles from the road. Any subdivision of a section of land containing forty acres, more or less, for the purposes of the benefit assessment may be included in such district if one fourth thereof is within the lines of the district. The board may collect from a benefit district an amount equal to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each lineal mile of road constructed therein, and no more, except interest on the amount that may be expended twelve months or more in advance of the collection of any tax. The board shall not undertake the construction of any road when the estimate indicates that the total cost will exceed Thirty-five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) per mile.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 366; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3739; 1930, § 6460; 1942, § 8411.

§ 65-19-87.
Collection of benefit district taxes.

The board shall provide for the collection of taxes from the benefit district in such annual installments as it may determine, extending over not more than fifteen years, and may borrow money in advance of the collection of such taxes, in which event an amount sufficient to pay the annual interest shall be collected in addition to the principal. The taxes so assessed and levied shall be a lien upon the land and be collected at the same time and in the same manner that state and county taxes are collected. A separate assessment roll shall be provided by the board, and the assessor shall assess the lands in each benefit district separately, together with the benefit tax assessed thereon. He shall also mark in red ink on the general assessment roll the particular lands the benefits of which have been assessed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 367; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3740; 1930, § 6461; 1942, § 8412.

§ 65-19-88.
Construction and improvement of unpaved streets or roads within developed subdivision.

Whenever the owners of not less than one-half (1/2) of all lots bordering on any unpaved, dedicated public street or road within a developed subdivision located outside the boundaries of any incorporated municipality of a county petition for a survey and estimate of the cost of building and paving the street or road in a substantial and permanent manner of asphalt, blacktop, concrete or other such material equally durable, the board may cause a survey and cost estimate thereof to be made by a licensed civil engineer. Thereafter, if at least three-fifths (3/5) of such landowners sign and file a petition with the board of supervisors, along with a map or description of the lots bordering such street or road and designating the owners of all lots bordering thereon, requesting such street or road to be paved with the costs thereof to be charged or assessed against the owners of such lots bordering thereon, the board of supervisors may proceed to the paving and permanent construction of such street or road. The entire costs of paving and permanently constructing such street or road within the subdivision shall be paid by the owners of the lots bordering on the street or road so improved within the subdivision only by either, at the option of each such lot owner, a lump sum, one-time payment or by a special tax imposed by the county on the lots sufficient to pay such lot owner’s proportionate share of the total costs. A lot owner’s share of the total costs for building and improving such street or road shall be determined according to the proportion which the number of lineal feet of a lot owner’s lot which borders on the improved street or road bears to the total number of lineal feet of improved street or road.

If one or more lot owners elect to pay their share of the costs of improving a street or road under subsection (1) of this section by means of a special tax on their lots, then the board shall provide for the collection of taxes from the lot owners thereof in such annual installments as it may determine, extending over not more than twenty (20) years, and may borrow money in advance of the collection of such taxes, in which event an amount sufficient to pay the annual interest shall be collected in addition to the principal. The taxes so assessed and levied shall be a lien upon the lots and be collected at the same time and in the same manner that state and county taxes are collected. A separate assessment roll shall be provided by the board, and the assessor shall assess the lots of each lot owner separately, together with the special tax assessed thereon. He shall also mark in red ink on the general assessment roll the particular lots which have been so assessed.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed as amending or repealing the provisions of Sections 65-19-83 through 65-19-87, but shall be supplemental and additional to the provisions contained therein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 497, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.